Utah statutes.
63M-1-2404.   Creation of economic development zones -- Tax credits.
(1)  The office, with advice from the board, may create an economic
development zone in the state that satisfies all of the following
requirements:
(a)  the area is zoned commercial, industrial, manufacturing, business park,
research park, or other appropriate use in a community-approved master plan;
and
(b)  the request to create a development zone has been forwarded to the office
after first being approved by an appropriate local government entity that has
committed or will commit to provide local incentives.
(2) (a)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office shall make rules establishing
the conditions that a business entity must meet to qualify for a tax credit
under this part.
(b)  The office shall ensure that those conditions include the following
requirements:
(i)  the new commercial project must be within the development zone;
(ii)  the new commercial project includes direct investment within the
geographic boundaries of the development zone;
(iii)  the new commercial project brings new incremental jobs to Utah;
(iv)  the new commercial project includes significant capital investment, the
creation of high paying jobs, or significant purchases from Utah vendors and
providers, or any combination of these three economic factors;
(v)  the new commercial project generates new state revenues; and
(vi)  the business entity qualifying for the tax credit meets the requirements
of Section 63M-1-2405.
(3) (a)  The office, with advice from the board, may enter into an agreement
with a business entity authorizing a tax credit to a business entity that
meets the standards established under Subsection (2).
(b)  The office may not authorize or commit to authorize a tax credit to a
business entity if that tax credit exceeds:
(i)  50% of the new state revenues from the business entity's new commercial
project in any given year; or
(ii)  30% of the new state revenues from the business entity's new commercial
project over the life of a new commercial project or 20 years, whichever is
less.
(4)  The office shall ensure that the agreement with the business entity that
is described in Subsection (3):
(a)  details the requirements that the business entity must meet to qualify
for a tax credit under this part;
(b)  specifies the maximum amount of tax credit that the business entity may
earn for a taxable year and over the life of the new commercial project;
(c)  establishes the length of time the business entity may claim a tax
credit;
(d)  requires the business entity to retain records supporting its claim for a
tax credit for at least four years after the business entity claims a tax
credit under this part; and
(e)  requires the business entity to submit to audits for verification of the
tax credit claimed.
